Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 304, as last


amended by Section 2, Chapter 369, O.S.L. 2025 (25 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 304), is amended to read as follows:


Section 304. As used in the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act:


1. “Public body” means the governing bodies of all


municipalities located within this state, boards of county


commissioners of the counties in this state, boards of public and


higher education in this state and all boards, bureaus, commissions,


agencies, trusteeships, authorities, councils, committees, public


trusts or any entity created by a public trust including any


committee or subcommittee composed of any of the members of a public


trust or other legal entity receiving funds from the Rural Economic

Req. No. 2569 Page 1


Action Plan Fund as authorized by Section 2007 of Title 62 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, task forces or study groups in this state


supported in whole or in part by public funds or entrusted with the


expending of public funds, or administering public property, and


shall include all committees or subcommittees of any public body.


Public body shall not include:


a. the state judiciary,


b. the Council on Judicial Complaints when conducting,


discussing, or deliberating any matter relating to a


complaint received or filed with the Council,


c. the Legislature,


d. administrative staffs of public bodies including, but


not limited to, faculty meetings and athletic staff


meetings of institutions of higher education when


those staffs are not meeting with the public body, or


entry-year assistance committees,


e. multidisciplinary teams provided for in Section 1-9-


102 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, in Section


10-115 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes, and in


subsection C of Section 1-502.2 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes or any school board meeting for the


sole purpose of considering recommendations of a


multidisciplinary team and deciding the placement of


any child who is the subject of the recommendations,

Req. No. 2569 Page 2


f. meetings conducted by stewards designated by the


Oklahoma Horse Racing Commission pursuant to Section


203.4 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes when the


stewards are officiating at races or otherwise


enforcing rules of the Commission,


g. the board of directors of a Federally Qualified Health


Center or the postadjudication review boards provided


for in Sections 1116.2 and 1116.3 of Title 10 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, or


h. boards of county commissioners for the purposes set


forth in subsections C, D, and E of Section 326 of


Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. “Meeting” means the conduct of business of a public body by


a majority of its members being personally together or, as


authorized by Section 307.1 of this title, together pursuant to a


videoconference. Any task force, working group, advisory group,


study group, committee, subcommittee, or other group which is


convened or created by a public body to discuss and deliberate, for


the purpose of making recommendations to the public body, regardless


of the number of members present, shall constitute a meeting of the


public body. Meeting shall not include informal gatherings of a


majority of the members of the public body when no business of the


public body is discussed;



Req. No. 2569 Page 3


3. “Regularly scheduled meeting” means a meeting at which the


regular business of the public body is conducted;


4. “Special meeting” means any meeting of a public body other


than a regularly scheduled meeting or emergency meeting;


5. “Emergency meeting” means any meeting called for the purpose


of dealing with an emergency. For purposes of the Oklahoma Open


Meeting Act, an emergency is defined as a situation involving injury


to persons or injury and damage to public or personal property or


immediate financial loss when the time requirements for public


notice of a special meeting would make such procedure impractical


and increase the likelihood of injury or damage or immediate


financial loss;


6. “Continued or reconvened meeting” means a meeting which is


assembled for the purpose of finishing business appearing on an


agenda of a previous meeting. For the purposes of the Oklahoma Open


Meeting Act, only matters on the agenda of the previous meeting at


which the announcement of the continuance is made may be discussed


at a continued or reconvened meeting;


7. “Videoconference” means a conference among members of a


public body remote from one another who are linked by interactive


telecommunication devices or technology, or technology permitting


both visual and auditory communication between and among members of


the public body or between and among members of the public body and


members of the public. During any videoconference, both the visual

Req. No. 2569 Page 4


and auditory communications functions shall attempt to be utilized;


and


8. “Teleconference” means a conference among members of a


public body remote from one another who are linked by


telecommunication devices or technology permitting auditory


communication between and among members of the public body or


between and among members of the public body and members of the


public.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2569 BLB 1/15/2026 2:06:51 PM



























Req. No. 2569 Page 5